es: Método de fijación del prensatelas: Conjunto de prensatelas de doble arrastre integrado; Requiere adaptador; A rosca; A presión; Otro
ko: 노루발 부착 방법: 일체형 워킹 풋 어셈블리; 어댑터 필요; 나사식; 스냅온; 기타
sl-SI: Način pritrjevanja šivalne tace: Vgrajen sklop pomične tačke; Potrebuje adapter; Na vijak; Na zatič; Drugo
tr: Baskı ayağı takma yöntemi: Entegre yürüyen ayak montajı; Adaptör gerektirir; Vidalı; Çıtçıtlı; Diğer
fi: Paininjalan kiinnitystapa: Integroitu yläsyöttäjä; Vaatii sovittimen; Ruuvattava; Napsautettava; Muu
ru: Способ крепления лапки швейной машины: Встроенная система шагающей лапки; Требуется адаптер; Винтовое крепление; Защелкивающееся крепление; Другое
hu: Varrótalp rögzítési módja: Beépített felső anyagtovábbító; Adaptert igényel; Csavarozható; Pattintós (snap-on); Egyéb
th: วิธีการติดตั้งตีนเย็บ: ชุดตีนผีวอล์กกิ้งฟุตในตัว; ต้องใช้อะแดปเตอร์; แบบขันสกรู; แบบสแนปออน; อื่นๆ
nb: Metode for festing av trykkfot: Integrert overtransportør; Krever adapter; Skrus på; Klikkes på (snap-on); Annet
sk-SK: Spôsob pripevnenia prítlačnej pätky: Integrovaná kráčajúca pätka; Vyžaduje sa adaptér; Skrutkovacia; Nacvakávacia; Iné
pl: Metoda mocowania stopki dociskowej: Zintegrowany górny transport; Wymaga adaptera; Przykręcana; Zatrzaskowa; Inne
fr: Mode de fixation du pied-de-biche: Pied double entraînement intégré; Adaptateur requis; À visser; Encliquetable; Autre
hr-HR: Metoda pričvršćivanja pritisne stopice: Sklop integrirane hodajuće stopice; Potreban je adapter; Na uvrtanje; Brzo pričvršćivanje; Ostalo
zh-CN: 压脚安装方式: 集成式同步压脚组件; 需要适配器; 螺钉固定; 卡扣固定; 其他
en: Presser foot attachment method: Integrated walking foot assembly; Requires adapter; Screw-on; Snap-on; Other
pt-PT: Método de fixação do calcador: Conjunto de calcador integrado; Requer adaptador; De enroscar; De encaixe; Outro
zh-TW: 壓腳連接方式: 整合式同步壓腳套件; 需要轉接器; 鎖入式; 卡扣式; 其他
lt-LT: Prispaudimo pėdelės tvirtinimo būdas: Integruotas žingsniuojančios pėdelės mechanizmas; Reikalingas adapteris; Prisukama; Prisegama; Kita
ro-RO: Metoda de atașare a piciorușului presor: Ansamblu integrat cu picioruș de transport; Necesită adaptor; Fixare cu șurub; Prindere rapidă; Altele
ja: 押え金の取り付け方法: 一体型ウォーキングフット; アダプターが必要; ネジ式; スナップオン式; その他
da: Metode til fastgørelse af trykfod: Integreret overtransportør; Kræver adapter; Til at skrue på; Snap-on; Andet
vi: Phương pháp gắn chân vịt: Cụm chân vịt bước tích hợp; Yêu cầu ngàm chuyển đổi; Bắt vít; Dạng gài; Khác
el: Τρόπος τοποθέτησης του ποδιού ραπτομηχανής.: Ενσωματωμένο σύστημα ποδιού μεταφοράς; Απαιτεί προσαρμογέα; Βιδωτό; Κουμπωτό; Άλλο
de: Befestigungsart des Nähfußes: Integrierter Obertransportfuß; Erfordert Adapter; Zum Anschrauben; Zum Einrasten; Sonstige
nl: Naaivoet bevestigingsmethode: Geïntegreerde boventransportvoet; Adapter vereist; Opschroefbaar; Klikbaar; Overig
sv: Metod för fastsättning av pressarfot: Integrerad matarfot; Kräver adapter; Skruvas på; Knäpps på; Annat
bg-BG: Начин на закрепване на крачето на шевната машина: Интегриран горен транспорт (Walking foot); Изисква адаптер; С винт; С щракване (Snap-on); Друго
pt-BR: Calcador método de fixação: Conjunto de pé calcador integrado; Requer adaptador; Parafusável; Encaixável; Outros
cs: Způsob upevnění přítlačné patky: Integrovaná kráčející patka; Vyžaduje adaptér; Šroubovací; Nacvakávací; Jiné
it: Metodo di fissaggio del piedino per macchina da cucire: Gruppo piedino a doppio trasporto integrato; Richiede adattatore; Avvitabile; Agganciabile; Altro